Utah statutes.
58-60-506.   Qualifications for licensure on and after July 1, 2012.

(1)  An applicant for licensure under this part on and after July 1, 2012, must meet the following qualifications:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  satisfy the requirements of Subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7) respectively; and

(e)  except for licensure as a certified substance use disorder counselor intern and a certified advanced substance use disorder counselor intern, satisfy the examination requirement established by division rule under Section 58-1-203.

(2)  In accordance with division rules, an applicant for licensure as an advanced substance use disorder counselor shall produce:

(a)  certified transcripts from an accredited institution of higher education that:

(i)  meet division standards;

(ii)  verify the satisfactory completion of a baccalaureate or graduate degree; and

(iii)  verify the completion of prerequisite courses established by division rules;

(b)  documentation of the applicant's completion of a substance use disorder education program that includes:

(i)  at least 300 hours of substance use disorder related education, of which 200 hours may have been obtained while qualifying for a substance use disorder counselor license;

(ii)  a supervised practicum of at least 350 hours, of which 200 hours may have been obtained while qualifying for a substance use disorder counselor license; and

(c)  documentation of the applicant's completion of at least 4,000 hours of supervised experience in substance use disorder treatment, of which 2,000 hours may have been obtained while qualifying for a substance use disorder counselor license, that:

(i)  meets division standards; and

(ii)  is performed within a four-year period after the applicant's completion of the substance use disorder education program described in Subsection (2)(b), unless, as determined by the division after consultation with the board, the time for performance is extended due to an extenuating circumstance.

(3)  An applicant for licensure as a certified advanced substance use disorder counselor shall meet the requirements in Subsections (2)(a) and (b).

(4) (a)  An applicant for licensure as a certified advanced substance use disorder counselor intern shall meet the requirements in Subsections (2)(a) and (b).

(b)  A certified advanced substance use disorder counselor intern license expires at the earlier of:

(i)  the licensee passing the examination required for licensure as a certified advanced substance use disorder counselor; or

(ii)  six months after the certified advanced substance use disorder counselor intern license is issued.

(5)  In accordance with division rules, an applicant for licensure as a substance use disorder counselor shall produce:

(a)  certified transcripts from an accredited institution that:

(i)  meet division standards;

(ii)  verify satisfactory completion of an associate's degree or equivalent as defined by the division in rule; and

(iii)  verify the completion of prerequisite courses established by division rules;

(b)  documentation of the applicant's completion of a substance use disorder education program that includes:

(i)  completion of at least 200 hours of substance use disorder related education; and

(ii)  completion of a supervised practicum of at least 200 hours; and

(c)  documentation of the applicant's completion of at least 2,000 hours of supervised experience in substance use disorder treatment that:

(i)  meets division standards; and

(ii)  is performed within a two-year period after the applicant's completion of the substance use disorder education program described in Subsection (5)(b), unless, as determined by the division after consultation with the board, the time for performance is extended due to an extenuating circumstance.

(6)  An applicant for licensure as a certified substance use disorder counselor shall meet the requirements of Subsections (5)(a) and (b).

(7) (a)  An applicant for licensure as a certified substance use disorder counselor intern shall meet the requirements of Subsections (5)(a) and (b).

(b)  A certified substance use disorder counselor intern license expires at the earlier of:

(i)  the licensee passing the examination required for licensure as a certified substance use disorder counselor; or

(ii)  six months after the certified substance use disorder counselor intern license is issued.



Amended by Chapter 123, 2013 General Session

